California, session 20252026, AB1446.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 78015 of the Education Code is amended to read:78015. (a) (1) The governing board of a community college district, prior to before establishing a vocational or occupational training program, shall conduct a job market study of the labor market area, as those terms are defined in Section 52301.5, in which it proposes to establish the program. The study shall use the State-Local Cooperative Labor Market Information Program established in Section 10533 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or if this program is not available in the labor market area, other available sources of labor market information. The study shall include a California Occupational Information System supply analysis of existing vocational and occupational education or training programs for adults maintained by high schools, community colleges, and private postsecondary schools educational institutions in the area to ensure that the anticipated employment demand for students in the proposed programs justifies the establishment of the proposed courses of instruction.(2) The governing board of the community college district shall make copies of each job market study available to the public.(b) Subsequent to After completing the study required by this section and prior to before establishing the program, the governing board of the community college district shall determine whether or not the study justifies the proposed vocational education program.(c) If the governing board of the community college district determines that the job market study justifies the initiation of the proposed program, it shall determine, by resolution, whether the program shall be offered through the district’s own facilities or through a contract with an approved private postsecondary school educational institution pursuant to Section 8092.